en: LNB technology: 4K; C-band; Circular polarization; DiSEqC; Dual polarization; HD; High gain; Hybrid; Ka-band; Ku-band; Low noise; Monoblock; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universal; Wideband; Other
cs: Technologie satelitního konvertoru (LNB): 4K; Pásmo C; Kruhová polarizace; DiSEqC; Duální polarizace; HD; Vysoký zisk; Hybridní; Pásmo Ka; Pásmo Ku; Nízká hlučnost; Monoblok; SCR; Standardní; UniCable; Univerzální; Wideband; Jiné
de: LNB-Technologie: 4K; C-Band; Zirkularpolarisation; DiSEqC; Doppelte Polarisation; HD; High Gain; Hybrid; Ka-Band; Ku-Band; Rauscharm; Monoblock; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universell; Breitband; Sonstiges
it: Tecnologia LNB: 4K; Banda C; Polarizzazione circolare; DiSEqC; Doppia polarizzazione; HD; High gain; Ibrido; Banda Ka; Banda Ku; Rumore basso; Monoblocco; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universale; Banda larga; Altro
ro-RO: Tehnologie LNGB: 4K; C-band; Polarizare circulară; DiSEqC; Polarizare dublă; HD; High gain; Hibrid; Ka-band; Ku-band; Zgomot redus; Monobloc; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universal; Bandă largă; Altele
es: Tecnología del LNB: 4K; Banda C; Polarización circular; DiSEqC; Doble polarización; HD; Alta ganancia; Híbrido; Banda Ka; Banda Ku; Bajo ruido; Monobloque; SCR; Estándar; Unicable; Universal; Banda ancha; Otros
tr: Lnb Teknolojisi: 4K; C-bandı; Dairesel polarizasyon; DiSEqC; Çift polarizasyon; HD; Yüksek kazanç; Hibrit; Ka-band; Ku-band; Düşük gürültülü; Monoblok; SCR; Standart; Unicable; Her türden mekana uygun; Geniş bant; Diğer
bg-BG: LNB технология: 4K; C-обхват; Кръгова поляризация; DiSEqC; Двойна поляризация; HD; Високо усилване; Хибрид; Ка-лента; Ku-лента; Нисък шум; Моноблок; SCR; Стандартна; Unicable; Универсална; Широколентова; Други
sk-SK: Technológia LNB: 4K; C-pásmo; Kruhová polarizácia; DiSEqC; Dvojitá polarizácia; HD; Vysoký zisk; Hybridný; Ka-pásmo; Ku-pásmo; Nízka hlučnosť; Monoblok; SCR; Štandardný; Unicable; Univerzálny; Širokopásmový; Iné
zh-CN: LNB 技术: 4K; C 频段; 圆偏振; DiSEqC; 双极化; 高清; 高增益; 混合型; Ka 频段; Ku 频段; 低噪声; 整体式; SCR; 标准; 单线; 通用; 宽带; 其他
pl: Technologia Lnb: 4K; C-Band; Polaryzacja kołowa; DiSEqC; Podwójna polaryzacja; HD; Duże wzmocnienie; Hybrydowy; Pasmo Ka; Pasmo Ku; Niski poziom hałasu; Monoblok; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Uniwersalny; Szerokie pasmo; Inne
nl: LNB-technologie: 4K; C-band; Circulaire polarisatie; DiSEqC; Dubbele polarisatie; HD; High gain; Hybride; Ka-band; Ku-band; Laag geluidsniveau; Monoblok; SCR; Standaard; Unicable; Universeel; Breedband; Andere
fi: Lnb-tekniikka: 4K; C-band; Pyöreä polarisaatio; DiSEqC; Kaksoispolarisaatio; HD; High gain; Hybridi; Ka-band; Ku-band; Low noise; Monoblock; SCR; Tavallinen; Unicable; Yleinen; Laajakaista; Muu
pt-PT: Tecnologia LNB: 4K; Banda C; Polarização circular; DiSEqC; Polarização dupla; HD; Alto ganho; Híbrido; Banda Ka; Banda Ku; Ruído baixo; Monobloco; SCR; Padrão; Unicable; Universal; Banda larga; Outro
fr: Technologie LNB: 4K; Bande C; Polarisation circulaire; DiSEqC; Double polarisation; HD; Gain élevé; Hybrid; Ka-band; Ku-band; Faible bruit; Monobloc; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universel; Large bande; Autre
ru: Технология конвертера: 4K; C-диапазон; Круговая поляризация; DiSEqC; Двойная поляризация; HD; Высокий коэффициент усиления; Гибридные; Ka-диапазон; Ku-диапазон; Низкий уровень шума; Моноблок; SCR; Стандартный; Unicable; Универсальный; Широкополосный; Другое
da: Lnb-teknologi: 4K; C-bånd; Cirkulær polarisering; DiSEqC; Dobbelt polarisering; HD; Højt gain; Hybrid; Ka-bånd; Ku-bånd; Lav støj; Monoblok; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universal; Bredbånd; Andet
ko: LNB 기술: 4K; C밴드; 원형 편광; DiSEqC; 이중 편광; HD; 하이 게인; 하이브리드; Ka밴드; Ku밴드; 저소음; 모노블록; SCR; 표준; 유니케이블; 범용; 광대역; 기타
hr-HR: LNB tehnologija: 4K; C-pojas; Kružna polarizacija; DiSEqC; Dvojna polarizacija; HD; Visoki dobitak; Hibridna; Ka-pojas; Ku-pojas; Niska razina buke; Monoblok; SCR; Standardno; Jednokabelsko; Univerzalno; Širokopojasno; Ostalo
sv: Lnb-teknik: 4K; C-band; Cirkulär polarisering; DiSEqC; Dubbel polarisering; HD; Hög ökning; Hybrid; Ka-band; Ku-band; Lågt brus; Monoblock; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universell; Brett band; Övrigt
ja: LNB技術: 4K; Cバンド; 円偏波; DiSEqC; デュアル偏波; HD; ハイゲイン; ハイブリッド; Kaバンド; Kuバンド; 低ノイズ; モノブロック; SCR; スタンダード; ユニケーブル; ユニバーサル; ワイドバンド; その他
sl-SI: Tehnologija LNB: 4K; C-pas; Krožna polarizacija; DiSEqC; Dvojna polarizacija; HD; Visoko ojačanje; Hibridna; Ka-pas; Ku-pas; Nizka raven hrupa; Monoblok; SCR; Standardna; Enokabelski; Univerzalno; Širokopasovna; Drugo
pt-BR: Tecnologia LNB: 4K; Banda C; Polarização circular; DiSEqC; Polarização dupla; HD; Alto ganho; Híbrida; Banda Ka; Banda Ku; Baixo ruído; Monobloco; SCR; Padrão; Unicável; Universal; Banda larga; Outro
hu: LNB technológia: 4K; C-sáv; Körkörös polarizáció; DiSEqC; Kettős polarizáció; HD; Nagy erősítés; Hibrid; Ka-sáv; Ku-sáv; Alacsony zajszint; Monoblokk; SCR; Normál; Egységesíthető; Univerzális; Szélessávú; Egyéb
th: เทคโนโลยี LNB: 4K; C-band; โพลาไรเซชันแบบวงกลม; DiSEqC; โพลาไรเซชันแบบคู่; HD; เกนสูง; แบบไฮบริด; Ka-band; Ku-band; นอยซ์ต่ำ; Monoblock; SCR; มาตรฐาน; Unicable; อเนกประสงค์; Wideband; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 訊號集波器技術: 4K; C 波段; 圓偏振; DiSEqC; 圓偏振; HD; 高增益; 混合; Ka 波段; Ku 波段; 低噪音; 單聲塊; SCR; 標準; 單纜; 通用; 寬頻; 其他
nb: Lnb-teknologi: 4K; C-bånd; Sirkulær polarisering; DiSEqC; Dobbelpolarisering; HD; Høy forsterkning; Hybrid; Ka-bånd; Ku-bånd; Lav lyd; Monoblokk; SCR; Standard; Unicable; Universal; Bredbånd; Annet
vi: Công nghệ Lnb: 4K; Băng tần C; Phân cực tròn; DiSEqC; Phân cực kép; HD; Khả năng khuếch đại cao; Ván kết hợp; Băng tần Ka; Băng tần Ku; Ít ồn; Khối đơn; SCR; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Unicable; Phổ biến; Băng rộng; Khác
el: Τεχνολογία LNB: 4K; C-band; Κυκλική πόλωση; DiSEqC; Διπλή πόλωση; HD; Υψηλής ενίσχυσης; Υβριδικό; Ka-band; Ku-band; Χαμηλού θορύβου; Μονομπλόκ; SCR; Κανονικό; Unicable; Καθολικής χρήσης; Ευρείας ζώνης; Άλλο
lt-LT: LNB technologija: 4K; C juosta; Žiedinė poliarizacija; DiSEqC; Dviguba poliarizacija; HD; Didelio stiprinimo; Hibridinė; Ka juosta; Ku juosta; Mažas triukšmas; Monoblokas; SCR; Standartinis; Vieno kabelio; Universalus; Plačiajuostis; Kita